Maryland, session 2026, HB0241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
4–201.
There is a State Board of Barbers in the Department.
4–702.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Maryland Program
Evaluation Act, this title and all regulations adopted under this title shall terminate and
be of no effect after July 1, [2027] 2032.
– 1 –

Ch. 127 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
5–201.
There is a State Board of Cosmetologists in the Department.
5–702.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Maryland Program
Evaluation Act, this title and all regulations adopted under this title shall terminate and
be of no effect after July 1, [2027] 2032.
15–201.
There is a State Board for Professional Land Surveyors in the Department.
15–702.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Maryland Program
Evaluation Act, this title and all regulations adopted under this title shall terminate and
be of no effect after July 1, [2027] 2032.
16–201.
There is a State Commission of Real Estate Appraisers, Appraisal Management
Companies, and Home Inspectors in the Department.
16–802.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Maryland Program
Evaluation Act, this title and all regulations adopted under this title shall terminate and
be of no effect after July 1, [2026] 2032.
21–201.
There is a State Board of Individual Tax Preparers in the Department.
21–502.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Maryland Program
Evaluation Act, this title and all regulations adopted under this title shall terminate and
be of no effect after July 1, [2027] 2032.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, 2030, the
Maryland Department of Labor shall submit to the Joint Audit and Evaluation Committee,
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 127
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, a report with information as
determined by the Joint Audit and Evaluation Committee for each of the following entities:
(1) the State Board of Barbers;
(2) the State Board of Cosmetologists;
(3) the State Board for Professional Land Surveyors;
(4) the State Commission of Real Estate Appraisers, Appraisal
Management Companies, and Home Inspectors; and
(5) the State Board of Individual Tax Preparers.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 3 –